Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8602.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Noah David
Lloyd may join Lucia Helen Given and Noah Alexander Moroski in marriage within the Town of
Narragansett, Rhode Island, on or about September 27, 2026. Noah David Lloyd is hereby
authorized and empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant to and in accordance
with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General Laws, entitled “Solemnization of marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006547
========